South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4400.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 43 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 43-1-730.  (A) There is created the South Carolina Food Security Emergency Reserve Fund, to be administered by the Department of Social Services. The General Assembly shall appropriate no less than twenty-five million dollars annually from the state general fund or designated recurring revenue to support the continuity of nutrition assistance in the event of reductions to federal food programs. (B) If federal SNAP funding to the State of South Carolina is reduced by ten percent or more in any fiscal year, the Department of Social Services shall immediately activate emergency food security protocols, including expanded eligibility for state-funded food assistance programs and an immediate disbursement of up to ten million dollars from the Food Security Emergency Reserve Fund. (C) The Department shall expand eligibility for the SNAP Produce Bonus Program to include authorized community grocers, mobile markets, and nonprofit food retail programs that demonstrate a commitment to offering fresh produce and meet food safety and price fairness standards as defined by the department. (D) The Department of Social Services shall include recommendations for sustaining and expanding food access programs in its annual budget request. The department also shall engage philanthropic and private sector partners to explore long-term funding and innovation opportunities. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----